Alaska, session 34, HB326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 08.64.364(c) is amended to read: 04 (c) Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, 05 (1) a physician may not prescribe, dispense, or administer an abortion- 06 inducing drug under (a) of this section [UNLESS THE PHYSICIAN COMPLIES 07 WITH AS 18.16.010]; and 08 (2) a physician or physician assistant may not prescribe, dispense, or 09 administer a prescription drug in response to an Internet questionnaire or electronic 10 mail message to a person with whom the physician or physician assistant does not 11 have a prior physician-patient relationship. 12 * Sec. 2. AS 18.16.010 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 13 (k) A health care provider that prescribes, dispenses, or administers an 14 abortion-inducing drug to a person shall 15 (1) conduct an in-person physical examination of the person before 01 prescribing, dispensing, or administering the abortion-inducing drug; and 02 (2) schedule a follow-up appointment, to occur not later than 14 days 03 after the abortion, to confirm that the pregnancy was terminated and assess continued 04 blood loss. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.